Utah statutes.
63I-1-226.   Repeal dates, Title 26.

(1)  Title 26, Chapter 9f, Utah Digital Health Service Commission Act, is repealed July 1, 2015.

(2)  Section 26-18-12, Expansion of 340B drug pricing programs, is repealed July 1, 2013.

(3)  Title 26, Chapter 33a, Utah Health Data Authority Act, is repealed July 1, 2014.

(4)  Section 26-21-23, Licensing of non-Medicaid nursing care facility beds, is repealed July 1, 2011.

(5)  Title 26, Chapter 36a, Hospital Provider and Assessment Act, is repealed July 1, 2013.

